Illinois, session 104th, SB3772.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 39.16 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/39.16 new)7    Sec. 39.16. Air Pollution Control Construction Permitting 8in Areas of Environmental Justice Concern.9    (a) Legislative Findings. The General Assembly finds that:10        (1) all residents of this State have a right to a 11    healthful environment under Article XI of the Illinois 12    Constitution of 1970;13        (2) no community should bear disproportionate and 14    adverse effects from pollution;15        (3) in 2024, the Agency entered in an Informal 16    Resolution Agreement with the United States Environmental 17    Protection Agency requiring, among other things, 18    enhancements to its permit review process for certain 19    permit transactions in areas of environmental justice 20    concern; and 21        (4) such enhancements to the Agency's permit review 22    process are necessary to avoid the imposition of 23    disproportionate and adverse effects to communities in   SB3772 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1    areas of environmental justice concern, as such areas are 2    identified herein.3    The provisions of this Section shall be liberally 4construed to carry out the purposes of this Section. 5    (b) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:6    "Area of environmental justice concern" or "area of EJ 7concern" means a geographical area, the population of which 8potentially experiences disproportionate environmental harms 9and risks as a result of both environmental and socioeconomic 10conditions that may act cumulatively to affect health and the 11environment and contribute to persistent environmental health 12disparities. "Area of EJ concern" shall include all census 13block groups, and all areas within one mile of such census 14block groups, identified and updated by the Agency on a 15triennial basis as being within the top 25% of census blocks 16statewide, scored by multiplying each census block group's 17average statewide percentile for each of the following 18environmental indicators, by the census block group's average 19statewide percentile for each of the following socioeconomic 20indicators:21    Environmental indicators:22        (1) annual average concentration of particulate matter 23    less than 2.5 microns or smaller in diameter;24        (2) annual average concentration of ozone;25        (3) annual average concentration of nitrogen dioxide;26        (4) annual average concentration of diesel particulate   SB3772 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1    matter;2        (5) annual average toxicity-weighted concentrations of 3    Toxic Release Inventory-listed chemicals;4        (6) vehicle traffic;5        (7) drinking water violations that have not been 6    returned to compliance;7        (8) percentage of housing units built pre-1960;8        (9) number of proposed or listed National Priorities 9    List sites;10        (10) number of facilities with Risk Management Plans;11        (11) number of treatment, storage, and disposal and 12    large-quantity generator hazardous waste facilities;13        (12) number of leaking underground storage tanks and 14    underground storage tanks; and15        (13) toxics concentrations at stream segments.16    Socioeconomic indicators - percentage of population:17        (1) with household income less than or equal to twice 18    the federal poverty level;19        (2) unemployed;20        (3) living in limited English proficiency households;21        (4) aged 25 or older whose education is short of a high 22    school diploma;23        (5) under the age of 5; and24        (6) over the age of 64.25    Environmental indicators (7) through (13) are given half 26the weight of environmental indicators (1) through (6) in   SB3772 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1calculating the averaged percentile.2    (c) Applicability. This Section applies to the following 3permits for which an owner or operator applies on or after 4January 1, 2027:5        (1) a construction permit for a new source that is to 6    be located in an area of EJ concern and that will require a 7    Clean Air Act Permit Program permit, or a Federally 8    Enforceable State Operating Permit issued by the Agency 9    under Section 39.5 of this Act;10        (2) a construction permit for any existing source that 11    is located in an area of EJ concern, that possesses a Clean 12    Air Act Permit Program permit, or a Federally Enforceable 13    State Operating Permit issued by the Agency under Section 14    39.5 of this Act and that seeks an increase in annual 15    permitted emissions; or16        (3) a construction permit for any existing source that 17    is located in an area of EJ concern, that seeks an increase 18    in annual permitted emissions and that will require a new 19    Clean Air Act Permit Program permit, or a Federally 20    Enforceable State Operating Permit issued by the Agency 21    under Section 39.5 of this Act for the first time. 22    (d) Review of permit applications; notifications. Upon 23receipt of an air pollution control construction permit 24application, the Agency shall evaluate the application to:25        (1) determine whether the source falls within an area 26    of EJ concern. Based on this review, the Agency shall send   SB3772 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1    an EJ notification letter to elected officials, community 2    groups, and individuals who have requested to be notified, 3    to provide information about the proposed project and how 4    an individual can request a public hearing on a permit 5    application;6        (2) determine whether emissions increases from the 7    proposed project can be reduced or voluntarily limited by 8    the applicant to avoid or minimize potential air emission 9    increases to any affected area(s) of EJ concern. This 10    includes, but is not limited to, establishment of lower 11    thresholds for potential-to-emit, installation of 12    alternative pollution controls, and decreased utilization 13    of other units at the facility; and14        (3) determine the need for the applicant to conduct 15    additional air quality modeling to confirm that the 16    project will not threaten or compromise existing National 17    Ambient Air Quality Standards or other applicable 18    standards appropriate for comparison with other pollutants 19    of concern. 20    (e) Permit enhancements.21        (1) The Agency shall evaluate and, if necessary to 22    comply with this Act, include appropriate permit 23    enhancements to address potential air emission increases 24    to an area of EJ concern. These enhancements may include, 25    but are not limited to:26            (A) improved air monitoring systems, including   SB3772 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1        parametric and continuous monitoring systems;2            (B) development of a fugitive dust operating 3        program/plan or enhancements to an existing 4        program/plan;5            (C) operational requirements to establish limits 6        on potential-to-emit or to demonstrate source 7        compliance with an emission rate;8            (D) increased use or frequency of emissions 9        testing;10            (E) development of enforceable requirements to go 11        into the construction permit to assure that the source 12        meets modeling assumptions used in the air quality 13        modeling (including hours of operation, operating 14        requirements, operating schedule, meteorological 15        assumptions, property boundaries, etc.);16            (F) development of an odor control plan to 17        identify and mitigate potential off-site odor impacts 18        from the project;19            (G) development of odor monitoring of third-party 20        complaints, including a process for tracking 21        complaints and inspecting affected process operations 22        known to be capable of causing air pollution;23            (H) discretionary use of prior adjudications of 24        violations of this Act and regulations adopted 25        thereunder by the applicant that involve a release of 26        a contaminant into the environment in evaluating the   SB3772 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1        permit application;2            (I) discretionary use of reasonable conditions 3        specifically related to an applicant's past compliance 4        history with this Act and regulations adopted 5        thereunder as necessary to correct, detect, or prevent 6        noncompliance;7            (J) use of pollution prevention techniques; or8            (K) applicant outreach, independent of the permit 9        review process, with the affected community.10        (2) The Agency may also conduct further analysis, as 11    needed, to inform its permit decision, including:12            (A) consideration of information relating to other 13        sources permitted by the Agency or the United States 14        Environmental Protection Agency;15            (B) information relating to regulated sources 16        under State or federal environmental laws;17            (C) data bearing upon the classification of an 18        area of EJ concern;19            (D) location of sensitive populations or places 20        near the proposed facility, including schools, 21        hospitals, day care centers, and culturally 22        significant resources;23            (E) factors that may increase community exposure 24        or vulnerability as compared to other populations; or25            (F) consultation with the United States 26        Environmental Protection Agency or other state and   SB3772 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1        federal regulatory authorities regarding additional 2        areas of study.3        (3) If the Agency's analysis described in this Section 4    shows disproportionate and adverse effects, the Agency 5    shall consider making additional refinements to the 6    project emissions analysis, air quality modeling, or 7    permit enhancements; prioritizing compliance inspections 8    and any resulting enforcement initiatives of an 9    applicant's existing permitted source or other 10    contributing sources to the affected area, with the aim of 11    reducing existing adverse impacts; prioritizing grant 12    funding for projects in the affected community; and 13    conducting consultations with the United States 14    Environmental Protection Agency or other state and federal 15    agencies relating to potential mitigation options, 16    including fence-line monitoring, risk assessments, or 17    rulemakings.18    (f) Issuance of permits.19        (1) In making its determination on permit applications 20    identified in Section 39.16(2) of this Act, the Agency 21    shall consider prior adjudications of noncompliance with 22    this Act and regulations adopted thereunder by the 23    applicant. In granting permits, the Agency shall consider 24    whether to impose reasonable conditions specifically 25    related to the applicant's past compliance history with 26    this Act and regulations adopted thereunder as necessary   SB3772 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1    to correct, detect, or prevent noncompliance. This may 2    include consideration of:3            (A) information contained within USEPA's and the 4        Agency's environmental compliance tracking system;5            (B) information submitted in public comments to a 6        construction permit application pending review;7            (C) judicial or administrative consent decrees or 8        compliance orders that are entered into, or issued by, 9        USEPA involving requirements of the Illinois State 10        Implementation Plan; or11            (D) information relating to State-only compliance 12        history.13        (2) The Agency shall prepare a written analysis of its 14    evaluation of compliance enforcement history, as well as 15    any additional civil rights analysis or mitigation 16    measures undertaken. The analysis shall be prepared before 17    a notice of public comment or hearing concerning a draft 18    construction permit and must be posted among the documents 19    available on the Agency's public notice website or public 20    repository. If no public participation is provided for 21    under Agency rules, the analysis shall be posted to the 22    Agency's public notice webpage at the time of permit 23    issuance.24    (g) Severability. If any provision of this Section or its 25application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the 26invalidity of that provision or application does not affect   SB3772 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16637 BDA 30040 b1other provisions or applications of this Section that can be 2given effect without the invalid provision or application.  3    Section 10. The Environmental Justice Act is amended by 4adding Section 18 as follows: 5    (415 ILCS 155/18 new)6    Sec. 18. Office of Environmental Justice. An Office of 7Environmental Justice is established within the Illinois 8Environmental Protection Agency. The Office shall coordinate 9the integration of environmental justice into Agency programs 10and activities, oversee implementation of language access 11policies, and provide enhanced public outreach to areas of 12environmental justice concern. The Director shall appoint an 13Environmental Justice Officer within the Office of 14Environmental Justice to administer the Office. 15    Section 97. Severability. If any provision of this 16Amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly or its 17application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the 18invalidity of that provision or application does not affect 19other provisions or applications of this Amendatory Act of the 20104th General Assembly that can be given effect without the 21invalid provision or application. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.